Maryland, session 2025, HB1188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 5–104 of Article – Criminal Procedure of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1188*

HOUSE BILL 1188
5–104.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3–201 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(3) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
CERTIFIED BY THE MARYLAND POLICE TRAINING AND STANDARDS COMMISSION
UNDER § 3–209 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(B) (1) WHENEVER A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENT, OR LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY TAKES CUSTODY OF AN INDIVIDUAL, THE
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENT, OR LOCAL DETENTION
FACILITY SHALL RUN A SEARCH OF THE INDIVIDUAL IN THE NATIONAL CRIME
INFORMATION CENTER (NCIC).
(2) IF THE SEARCH REQUIRED BY PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION REVEALS THAT AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT LAWFULLY PRESENT IN
THE UNITED STATES IS THE SUBJECT OF AN OUTSTANDING CRIMINAL WARRANT,
THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENT, OR LOCAL
DETENTION FACILITY:
(I) SHALL NOTIFY FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES:
1. THAT THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENT, OR LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY HAS TAKEN CUSTODY OF
THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
2. OF THE DETAILS OF THE CUSTODY, INCLUDING, IF
APPLICABLE, INFORMATION ON THE PLANNED RELEASE OF THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) IF REQUESTED BY FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES,
SHALL:
1. RETAIN CUSTODY OF THE INDIVIDUAL FOR UP TO 48
HOURS BEYOND THE PLANNED RELEASE OF THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
2. COOPERATE WITH FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES TO ARRANGE FOR THE TRANSFER OF THE INDIVIDUAL TO FEDERAL
IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES.

HOUSE BILL 1188 3
(C) DURING AN INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS SECTION, A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENT, OR LOCAL DETENTION
FACILITY SHALL PROVIDE AN INTERPRETER FOR ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO REQUIRES
ONE TO EFFECTIVELY COMMUNICATE.
(D) THE STATE, A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A COUNTY SHERIFF, OR AN
AGENCY OF THE STATE OR A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY NOT ADOPT,
IMPLEMENT, OR ENFORCE ANY POLICY THAT LIMITS OR PROHIBITS COOPERATION
WITH FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES IN THE INVESTIGATION OR
APPREHENSION OF INDIVIDUALS WITH OUTSTANDING CRIMINAL WARRANTS WHO
ARE NOT LAWFULLY PRESENT IN THE UNITED STATES.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.